Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB48.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 439.3406 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall order mandatory reentry supervision six (6) months prior to the
projected completion date of an inmate's sentence for an inmate who has not been
granted discretionary parole.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to an inmate who:
(a) Is not eligible for parole by statute;
(b) Has been convicted of a capital offense or a Class A felony;
(c) Has previously been convicted of two (2) or more offenses that would
classify him or her as a violent offender under KRS 439.3401;
(d) Has a maximum or close security classification as defined by administrative
regulations promulgated by the department;
(e)[(d)] Has been sentenced to two (2) years or less of incarceration;
(f)[(e)] Is subject to the provisions of KRS 532.043;
(g)[(f)] Has six (6) months or less to be served after his or her sentencing by a
court[ or recommitment to prison for a violation of probation, shock
probation, parole, or conditional discharge];
(h)[(g)] Has been[If] recommitted to prison for a violation of probation, shock
probation, parole, or conditional discharge[, has not served at least six (6)
months since being recommitted]; or
(i)[(h)] Has twice been released on mandatory reentry supervision.
(3) An inmate granted mandatory reentry supervision pursuant to this section may be
returned by the board to prison for violation of the conditions of supervision and
shall not again be eligible for mandatory reentry supervision during the same period
of incarceration.
(4) An inmate released to mandatory reentry supervision shall be considered to be
Page 1 of 3
BR123600.100 - 1236 - XXXX 2/3/2026 2:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1236
released on parole.
(5) Mandatory reentry supervision is not a commutation of sentence or any other form
of clemency.
(6) No hearing shall be required for the board to order an inmate to mandatory reentry
supervision pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Terms of supervision for
inmates released on mandatory reentry supervision shall be established as follows:
(a) 1. The board shall adopt administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A establishing general conditions applicable to each
inmate ordered to mandatory reentry supervision pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section.
2. If an inmate is ordered to mandatory reentry supervision, the board's
order shall:
a. Set forth the general conditions; and[ shall]
b. Require the inmate to comply with the general conditions and any
requirements imposed by the department in accordance with this
section;
(b) Upon intake of an inmate ordered to mandatory reentry supervision by the
board, the department shall use the results of the risk and needs assessment
administered pursuant to KRS 439.3104(1) to establish appropriate terms and
conditions of supervision, taking into consideration the level of risk to public
safety, criminal risk factors, and the need for treatment and other
interventions. The terms and conditions imposed by the department under this
paragraph shall not conflict with the general conditions adopted by the board
pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) The powers and duties assigned to the commissioner in relation to probation
or parole under KRS 439.470 shall be assigned to the commissioner in
relation to mandatory reentry supervision.
Page 2 of 3
BR123600.100 - 1236 - XXXX 2/3/2026 2:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1236
(7) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the period of mandatory reentry
supervision shall conclude upon completion of the individual's minimum expiration
of sentence.
(8) If the board issues a warrant for the arrest of an inmate for absconding from
supervision during the mandatory reentry supervision period, and the inmate is
subsequently returned to prison as a violator of conditions of supervision for
absconding, the inmate shall not receive credit toward the remainder of his or her
sentence for the time spent absconding.
(9) The department shall report the results of the mandatory reentry supervision
program to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Judiciary or the Senate and House Standing Committees on
Judiciary, as appropriate, by February 1 of each year[, 2015].
Page 3 of 3
BR123600.100 - 1236 - XXXX 2/3/2026 2:31 PM Jacketed